District of Columbia statutes.
9-1213.03

Notice to remove; service.

Whenever, under the provisions of §§ 9-1213.01 and 9-1213.02 any barbed wire in use in whole or in part on July 8, 1898, for a fence, barrier, or obstruction, along the line of or in or upon any street, avenue, alley, road, or other public walk, driveway, or public or private parking within the District of Columbia is required to be removed, said wire shall be removed by the owner of the building or other property upon which such fence, barrier, or obstruction exists, or his or her agent, within 30 days from the service by the Inspector of Buildings of said District of a notice, served in like manner as notices in regard to assessment and permit work are required by law to be served, directing the owner, agent, or other person or persons owning or controlling the land, structure, or other property upon which such fence or barrier exists to remove the same.

July 8, 1898, 30 Stat. 724, ch. 640, § 3
1981 Ed., § 7-803.
1973 Ed., § 7-1103.